src/morphology/stems/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON NUM_
+Num+Card: # ;


LEXICON quantifiers

ühsi:ühsi NUM_  "yksi" ;
kahsi:kahsi NUM_  "kaksi" ;
kõlõd:kõlõd NUM_  "kolme" ;
nelʼlʼä:nelʼlʼä NUM_  "neljä" ;
viisi:viisi NUM_  "viisi" ;
kuusi:kuusi NUM_  "kuusi" ;
seitsee:seitsee NUM_  "seitsemän" ;
kahõsaa:kahõsaa NUM_  "kahdeksan" ;
ühesää:ühesää NUM_  "yhdeksän" ;
tšümmee:tšümmee NUM_  "kymmenen" ;
